Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 2
QUALIFICATIONS AND REGISTRATION OF ELECTORS

1-13.5-201. Registration required.

Except where a statute specifically provides otherwise, no person is permitted to vote at any local government election without first having registered to vote in Colorado in accordance with the "Uniform Election Code of 1992", articles 1 to 13 of this title.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 9, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-202. Persons entitled to vote at special district elections.

No person is permitted to vote in any special district election unless that person is an eligible elector as defined in section 32-1-103 (5), C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 9, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-203. Registration records for local government elections - costs.

No later than the fortieth day preceding the date of a scheduled local government election, the designated election official shall order the registration records from the county clerk and recorder. The designated election official shall order either:

An initial list of the registered electors as of the thirtieth day prior to the election, with a supplemental list to be provided on the twentieth day; or

A complete list of registered electors as of the sixth day prior to the election.

The county clerk and recorder shall certify and make available to the designated election official a complete copy of the list of the registered electors of the local government that has territorial boundaries located within the county and is involved in the election. If a supplemental list is provided pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section, the county clerk and recorder shall certify and make available to the designated election official the supplemental list of eligible electors who became eligible since the earlier list was certified. These lists substitute for the original registration record.

The registration list that is certified thirty days before the election pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section must contain the names and addresses of all registered electors residing within the local government at the close of business on the fortieth day preceding the election. The supplemental registration list for each local government that is certified no later than twenty days before the election must contain the names and addresses of all eligible electors residing within the local government at the close of business on the twenty-second day prior to the election. If a supplemental list is provided, it must contain the names and addresses of all eligible electors who became eligible during the period since the initial registration list was certified through the close of business on the twenty-second day preceding the election.

Costs for the lists required to be obtained under this section must be assessed by the county clerk and recorder and paid by the local government holding the election. The fee for furnishing the lists shall be no less than twenty-five dollars for the entire list or no more than one cent for each name contained on the registration list, whichever is greater.

The designated election official may cancel an order for the list if the election is canceled pursuant to section 1-13.5-513 and the county clerk and recorder has not already prepared the list.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 9, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-204. Lists of property owners - costs.

For elections where owning property in the local government is a requirement for voting in the election, no later than the fortieth day preceding the date of the election, the designated election official shall order the list of property owners from the county assessor. Except as otherwise required under subsection (2) of this section, the county assessor shall certify and deliver an initial list of all recorded owners of taxable real and personal property within the local government no later than thirty days before the election. The supplemental list for the local government shall be provided no later than twenty days before the election and shall contain the names and addresses of all recorded owners who became owners no later than twenty-two days prior to the election and after the initial list of property owners was provided. The county assessors shall assess the cost for the lists, which must be paid by the local government holding the election. The fee for furnishing the lists is no less than twenty-five dollars for both lists or no more than one cent for each name contained on the lists, whichever is greater.

The designated election official of a local government may order the list described in subsection (1) of this section of all recorded owners of taxable real and personal property within the local government as of the thirtieth day before the election, with a supplemental list to be provided on the twentieth day before the election, or the designated election official may order a complete list as of the sixth day before the election.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 10, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-205. Delivery and custody of registration list and property owner list.

At such time as may be set by the designated election official, but at least one day prior to the election, one of the election judges from each precinct may appear in person at the office of the designated election official for the purpose of receiving the registration list and, as applicable, property owners list, election supplies, or the designated election official may deliver the same to one of the judges. The judges shall have custody of the registration list and property owners list and shall give his or her receipt for the list. After the closing of the polls on the day of election, the election judge selected pursuant to section 1-13.5-410 to deliver the election papers and supplies shall deliver the registration list and property owners list to the office of the designated election official or to such other place as the designated election official may designate as the counting center.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 11, § 6, effective February 18.